Utah statutes.
52-6-102.   Definitions.

As used in this act:

(1)  "Officer or employee" means any individual who at the time of an event giving rise to a claim under this act is or was elected or appointed to or employed by a public entity, whether or not compensated, but does not include an independent contractor.

(2)  "Public entity" means the state or any political subdivision of it or any office, department, division, board, agency, commission, council, authority, institution, hospital, school, college, university, or other instrumentality of the state or any such political subdivision.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

